North Carolina, session 2025, SB1031.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Adult Correction the sum of two million two hundred sixty-one thousand dollars ($2,261,000) in
recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated in equal amounts to each
of the 17 local reentry councils in the State for the purpose of hiring at each local reentry council
one permanent, full-time Housing Support Specialist position and one permanent, full-time
Support Specialist position.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Adult Correction the sum of three million eight hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($3,825,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated in equal
amounts to each of the 17 local reentry councils in the State for the purpose of providing reentry
rental assistance to individuals served by each council. Funds appropriated by this section shall
not revert and shall be available to each local reentry council for the purpose of providing reentry
rental assistance until the funds are expended.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Adult Correction the sum of eight hundred sixty-seven thousand dollars ($867,000) in recurring
funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated in equal amounts to each of the 17
local reentry councils in the State for the purpose of providing transportation vouchers to
individuals on post-release supervision served by each council. Funds appropriated by this
section shall not revert and shall be available to each local reentry council for the purpose of
providing transportation vouchers to individuals on post-release supervision until the funds are
expended.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Adult Correction the sum of one hundred forty thousand dollars ($140,000) in recurring funds
beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be provided to contract with Central Piedmont
Community College and Fayetteville Technical Community College for the purpose of hiring
one full-time Reentry Education Navigator position at each community college to serve the needs
of justice-involved students.
SECTION 5. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Adult Correction the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to the State Reentry Council Collaborative to be used
to develop online professional development modules focused on teaching State agencies,
*S1031-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
educational institutions, and other nongovernmental stakeholders how best to serve individuals
with criminal records.
SECTION 6. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 2 Senate Bill 1031-First Edition